src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun 
ki+N+Sem/Msc:        KI 	"dog" ;
den+N+Sem/Msc:       DEN "man";
ojyon+N+Sem/Msc:     OJYON "ox" ;
kar+N+Sg:kar     mutation "parent" ;
kar+N+Pl:kerens  mutation "parents" ;
garlont          GARLONT "garland" ;
marchont         GARLONT  "merchant" ;
tulyfant         GARLONT  "tulip" ;
protestant       GARLONT "protestant" ;
abatti         m    "abbey"    ;
abes           m    "abbot"    ;
adhyskans      m    "education"  ;
afinans        m    "decoration" ;
aghskrif       m    "pedigree" ;
ahwer          m    "sorrow"   ; !no plural listed
akont          m    "account" ;
akontyans      m    "reckoning" ;
akord          m    "accord" ; !no plural listed
akordyans      m    "agreement" ;
akwityans      m    "receipt" ;
babi           m    "baby" ;
bagas          m    "group" ;
bagas-gwari    m     "play group" ;
bagasik	       m    "batch" ; 
berrskrif      m    "summary" ;
lyther         m    "letter" ;
mammskrif      m    "original text" ;
tas            m    "father" ;
bal            m-yow      "mine"     ;
acheson        m-ys       "reason"   ;
adamant        m-ys       "diamond"  ;
akont          m-ys       "account"  ;
akontydh       m-yon      "accountant" ;
aghskrifer:aghskrifor m-ag "genealogist" ;
bleujenner:bleujennor m-ag "florist" ;
begyer+N+Sem/Msc:begyor   yonpl "beggar" ; !also m-s
baban         m-es "baby" ; 
badh          m-es "boar" ;
bacheler      m-s  "bachelor" ;
balyer        m-s  "balyers" ;
banana        m-s  "banana" ;
begyer        m-s  "beggar" ;
degre         m-s  "degree" ;
gyglet        m-s  "wanton person" ; 
popynjay      m-s  "parrot" ;
balek:bale3k m ;
mab:ma4b            m-yon "son" ;
abostol:abo4sto4l        m-aff-i    "apostle"  ; !not working yet
adhvetter      m-sgtantum "ripeness"   ;
Afrikan        m-sgtantum "African"    ;
agha           m-sgtantum "dread"      ;
badh           m-sgtantum "bath"       ;
backen         m-sgtantum "bacon"      ;
blam           m-sgtantum "blame"      ;
blas           m-sgtantum "taste, smell" ;
arghans        m-pltantum "money" ; !MF
mona           m-pltantum "money" ; !NW
lavrok:lavrog m-ow ;
lavrok:lavreg m-ow ; !UC
aber       m-yow  "river mouth"  ;
arhadow    m-yow  "command"  ;
balyer     m-yow  "balyers [?ba?lj?rs] (pl.)"  ;
bay        m-yow  "kiss."  ;
ber        m-yow  "roasting spit."  ;
brastir    m-yow  "continent."  ;
chanj      m-yow  "change."  ;
dasson     m-yow  "echo."  ;
devis      m-yow  "device"  ;
digomposter      m-yow  "irregularity."  ;
downder      m-yow  "depth"  ;
dy'gol      m-yow  "feast-day"  ;
ebil      m-yow  "bolt"  ;
erbys      m-yow  "economy"  ;
fer      m-yow  "fair"  ;
galweyth      m-yow  "crime."  ;
glin      m-yow  "dewlin [?d??l?n] (dl.)"  ;
gow      m-yow  "lie"  ;
gruglon      m-yow  "heather-bush."  ;
gwigh      m-yow  "squeak."  ;
gwydhyv      m-yow  "bill-hook"  ;
heyl      m-yow  "estuary"  ;
iseldir      m-yow  "lowland."  ;
kantoler      m-yow  "chandelier"  ;
kav      m-yow  "cave. "  ;
kevals      m-yow  "joint"  ;
kin      m-yow  "kinyewow [k?n?j??w??] (pl.)"  ;
kornet      m-yow  "nook."  ;
krer      m-yow  "relic (of saint)."  ;
krygh      m-yow  "wrinkle"  ;
lavurlu      m-yow  "work-force."  ;
lin      m-yow  "fluid"  ;
lown      m-yow  "concourse"  ;
mengleudh      m-yow  "opencast mine-working."  ;
min      m-yow  "face"  ;
nivel      m-yow  "standard"  ;
praktis      m-yow  "practice"  ;
rin      m-yow  "mystery"  ;
tabour      m-yow  "tabor"  ;
tir      m-yow  "ground"  ;
tron      m-yow  "snout, throne "  ;
uskitter      m-yow  "velocity"  ;
kanel       m-ys  	"tap"  ;
mason       m-ys  	"mason"  ;
desir       m-ys  	"desire"  ;
enor		 m-ys 	"honour" ; 	 	
entent		 m-ys	"purpose" ;
remetant	 m-ys	"remain" ;
sant   		 m-ys	"course of a meal" ;
chalys		 m-ys	"chalice" ;
degre		 m-ys	"degree" ;
ertaj		 m-ys	"heritage" ;
offis		 m-ys	"function" ;
polat		 m-ys	"fellow" ;
rewl		 m-ys	"rule" ;
slod		 m-ys	"sledgehammer" ;
splat		 m-ys	"plot of ground" ;
tid			 m-ys	"tide" ;
trumach		 m-ys	"passage by water" ;
vertu		 m-ys	"power" ;
modrep:modreb f-edh ;
tanbellen          f             "bomb, shell (explosive)" ;
tavlinen          f             "tangent" ;
telynnyores          f             "harpist " ;
pellen          f             "ball, dumpling," ;
pennlinen          f             "headline pennlugarn (m.), pennlugern" ;
pennwlas          f             "chief country" ;
plasen          f             "record, disc," ;
plethen          f             "plait of hair, braid, reel (dance)" ;
plyw          f             "parish" ;
porthores          f             "porter " ;
prilehen          f             "tile" ;
prynses          f             "princess " ;
pysklyn          f             "fish-pond" ;
rakherdhel          f             "propeller" ;
ratheli          f             "grater, rasp" ;
reknel          f             "calculator" ;
restrenva          f             "filing cabinet restrer (m.), comb" ;
ros          f             "wheel, circle" ;
routh          f             "crowd, throng," ;
ruwvanes          f             "queen" ;
savon          f             "standard" ;
seth          f             "arrow" ;
skath                   f             "boat" ;
skeusen          f             "photograph" ;
skolores          f             "scholar" ;
skubel          f             "broom (implement)" ;
skyren          f             ", skyr splinter" ;
souben               f             "soup, broth" ;
spavnel          f             "iull" ;
steus          f             "course (of study)" ;
studhva          f             "study (room)" ;
synsel          f             "clip (e.g. paper-clip)" ;
testen          f             "subject (of study) " ;
teudhva          f             "foundry " ;
tigres          f             "tigress" ;
toll          f             "tax, toll, duty" ;
tonn          f             "wave, billow " ;
torrva          f             "rupture, breach, breakdown" ;
tresklen          f             ", treskel  missel-thrush " ;
trevas          f             "harvest, crop " ;
truflen          f             "trifle" ;
yeth          f             "language, way of speaking. " ;
alter       f-yow    "altar"  ;
anwan       f-yow    "anvil"  ;
arwodh     f-yow    "sign, symbol, emblem, annorial device"  ;
avon        f-yow    "river"  ;
awel        f-yow    "wind, gale, weather"  ;
batel       f-yow    "battle"  ;
bleujen     f-yow    "flower, bloom, blossom"  ;
bownder     f-yow    "lane"  ;
breuslys    f-yow    "assize-court, court of law"  ;
brow        f-yow    "handmill, quern"  ;
bynk        f-yow    "platform, bench"  ;
kadon       f-yow    "chain, bond (link), trace"  ;
kalter      f-yow    "kettle"  ;
kansbledhen f-yow    "century, hundred years"  ;
kasel       f-yow    "arm-pit, aisle underarm (US)"  ;
koloven     f-yow    "column"  ;
kow         f-yow    "enclosure, hollow"  ;
krows       f-yow    "cross, rood"  ;
kurun       f-yow    "crown"  ;
dama        f-yow    "mother"  ;
ehel        f-yow    "axle"  ;
eskeul      f-yow    "escalator"  ;
fenten      f-yow    "spring (water), fountain, surface well"  ;
fornes      f-yow    "furnace"  ;
goon        f-yow    "downland, unenclosed pasture, moor (upland)"  ;
gwers       f-yow    "gwers meythrin [ˌgwɛrzˈmɛɪθrɪn] nursery-rhyme"  ;
hellys      f-yow    "old court"  ;
kanel       f-yow    "channel, canal, water-channel, inlet of sea, television channel"  ;
kaskleudh   f-yow    "(pl"  ;
kloos       f-yow    "hurdle, fence, crate, trellis, lattice, rack, harrow"  ;
koloven     f-yow    "column"  ;
krowseryow  f-yow    "krowseryow"  ;
kyst        f-yow    "box (container), chest"  ;
loor        f-yow    "moon."  ;
mammvro     f-yow    "motherland."  ;
milvledhen  f-yow    "millennium."  ;
ostel       f-yow    "lodging, hostel, hotel"  ;
penntir   	f-yow    "headland"  ;
raw         f-yow    "strop, bond "  ;
sel         f-yow    "base, foundation "  ;
strolgyst   f-yow    "litter-bin,"  ;
troweyth    f-yow    "cycle (of motion)"  ;
